src/Inflection/ParadigmDefects/ParadigmDefects.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Nom +Acc +Gen +Ins +Sing +Plur +Inan +ParDef1 +ParDef3 +ParDef4 +ParDef5 +ParDef6 +ParDef7 +ParDef8 +ParDef9 +ParDef1%0 +ParDef11 +ParDef12 +ParDef13 +ParDef14 +ParDef15 +ParDef17

Definitions
  Gender = %+Masc|%+Fem|%+Neut;
	Number = %+Sing|%+Plur;
	Case = %+Nom|%+Acc|%+Gen|%+Loc|%+Dat|%+Ins;

LEXICON Root
+ParDef1+Nom   #;
<%+ParDef3 [Case - %+Nom]>          #;
<%+ParDef4 [Case - [%+Nom|%+Acc]]>  #;
+ParDef5+Gen   #;
+ParDef6+Sing  #;
+ParDef7+Sing  #;
+ParDef7+Plur+Nom   #;
+ParDef8+Plur+Nom   #;
+ParDef9+Plur+Gen   #;
+ParDef10+Plur+Gen   #;
+ParDef10+Plur+Acc   #;
<%+ParDef11 [Number Case - %+Sing [%+Nom|%+Acc]]>  #;
<%+ParDef12 [Number Case - %+Sing [%+Nom|%+Acc|%+Ins]]>  #;
<%+ParDef15 %+Fem Case>  #;
<%+ParDef15 Gender %+Inan Case>  #;
<%+ParDef17 %+Fem %+Sing [%+Nom|%+Acc]>  #;
